Utah statutes.
77-28c-105.   Compact for Adult Offender Supervision Restricted Account.
(1)  There is created within the General Fund, a restricted account known as
the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision Restricted Account.
(2)  Money in the account shall consist of the compact application fee
collected by the department for a transfer of supervision under the provisions
of Subsection 77-28c-104(3).
(3)  Upon appropriation by the Legislature, money in the account shall be
used:
(a)  to cover costs incurred in the collection of the fee; and
(b)  for the administration of the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender
Supervision, including the payment of the annual assessment levied under
Subsection 77-28c-103, Article X(b).
